test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibensibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibensibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibensibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibenyibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibenyibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibenyibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: izhiishiibenyibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: izhiishiibenyibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: izhiishiibenyibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: izhiishiibensibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: izhiishiibensibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: izhiishiibensibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nizhiishiibimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21: gizhiishiibimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gizhiishiibimishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv: ozhiishiibimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: nizhiishiibimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nizhiishiibimishidig, nizhiishiibimishidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: gizhiishiibimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gizhiishiibimishidig, gizhiishiibimishidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: ozhiishiibimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ozhiishiibimishidig, ozhiishiibimishidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: izhiishiibimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [izhiishiibimishidig, izhiishiibimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibimishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: nizhiishiibimishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibimishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibimishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: gizhiishiibimishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibimishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibimishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: ozhiishiibimishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibimishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibimishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: izhiishiibimishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibiminaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibiminaanidig, nizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Pret: gizhiishiibiminaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibiminaanidig, gizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibimiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gizhiishiibimiwaadig, gizhiishiibimiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret: ozhiishiibiminiiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [ozhiishiibiminiidig, ozhiishiibiminiidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret: ozhiishiibimiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [ozhiishiibimiwaadig, ozhiishiibimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibiminaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nizhiishiibiminaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Loc: gizhiishiibiminaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Obv: gizhiishiibiminaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gizhiishiibimiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Loc: ozhiishiibiminiing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Obv: ozhiishiibiminiin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibimiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Obv: ozhiishiibimiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibimibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibimibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibimibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibimibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibimibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibimibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibimibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibimibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibimibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: izhiishiibimibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: izhiishiibimibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: izhiishiibimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibishinaanidig, nizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Pret: gizhiishiibishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibishinaanidig, gizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gizhiishiibishiwaadig, gizhiishiibishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret: ozhiishiibishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [ozhiishiibishiniidig, ozhiishiibishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret: ozhiishiibishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [ozhiishiibishiwaadig, ozhiishiibishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nizhiishiibishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Loc: gizhiishiibishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Obv: gizhiishiibishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gizhiishiibishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Loc: ozhiishiibishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Obv: ozhiishiibishiniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Obv: ozhiishiibishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhiishiibishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhiishiibishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhiishiibishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibinaanidig, nizhiishiibinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibinaanidig, nizhiishiibinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibinaanidig, nizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibinaanidig, gizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibinaanidig, gizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibinaanidig, gizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibiwaadig, gizhiishiibiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibiwaadig, gizhiishiibiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibiwaadig, gizhiishiibiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibiniidig, ozhiishiibiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibiniidig, ozhiishiibiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibiniidig, ozhiishiibiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibiwaadig, ozhiishiibiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibiwaadig, ozhiishiibiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibiwaadig, ozhiishiibiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhiishiibenyishibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhiishiibenyishibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhiishiibenyishibaniig
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhiishiibensishibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhiishiibensishibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhiishiibensishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishinaan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nizhiishiibensimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gizhiishiibenyimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaa
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: gizhiishiibensimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: ozhiishiibenyimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: ozhiishiibensimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nizhiishiibenyimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nizhiishiibenyimishidig, nizhiishiibenyimishidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nizhiishiibensimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nizhiishiibensimishidig, nizhiishiibensimishidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gizhiishiibenyimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gizhiishiibenyimishidig, gizhiishiibenyimishidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gizhiishiibensimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gizhiishiibensimishidig, gizhiishiibensimishidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ozhiishiibenyimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ozhiishiibenyimishidig, ozhiishiibenyimishidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ozhiishiibensimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ozhiishiibensimishidig, ozhiishiibensimishidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: izhiishiibenyimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [izhiishiibenyimishidig, izhiishiibenyimishidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: izhiishiibensimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [izhiishiibensimishidig, izhiishiibensimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibenyimishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nizhiishiibenyimishan
